Utah statutes.
26-19-14.   Insurance policies not to deny or reduce benefits of persons eligible for state medical assistance -- Exemptions.

(1)  A policy of accident or sickness insurance issued or renewed after May 12, 1981, may not contain any provision denying or reducing benefits because services are rendered to an insured or dependent who is eligible for or receiving medical assistance from the state.

(2)  After May 12, 1981, no association, corporation, or organization may deliver, issue for delivery, or renew any subscriber's contract which contains any provisions denying or reducing benefits because services are rendered to a subscriber or dependent who is eligible for or receiving medical assistance from the state.

(3)  After May 12, 1981, no association, corporation, business, or organization authorized to do business in this state and which provides or pays for any health care benefits may deny or reduce benefits because services are rendered to a beneficiary who is eligible for or receiving medical assistance from the state.

(4)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), (2), or (3), the Utah State Public Employees Health Program, administered by the Utah State Retirement Board, is not required to reimburse any agency of state government for custodial care which the agency provides, through its staff or facilities, to members of the Utah State Public Employees Health Program.

(5)  This section is subject to the provisions of Subsection 31A-22-610.5(3).

